sl-SI: Pot aplikacije: Inhalacija; Intramuskularni vbrizg; Intravenozni vbrizg; Nosno pršilo; Oralno; Subkutani vbrizg; Podjezično; Supozitorij; Topično; Transdermalni obliž; Drugo
fi: Antoreitti: Inhalaatio; Lihaksensisäinen injektio; Laskimonsisäinen injektio; Nenäsuihke; Oraalinen; Ihonalainen injektio; Kielen alle; Peräpuikko; Ihon pinnalle; Transdermaali laastari; Muu
pt-BR: Via de administração: Inalação; Injeção intramuscular; Injeção intravenosa; Spray nasal; Oral; Injeção subcutânea; Sublingual; Supositório; Tópico; Adesivo transdérmico; Outro
pt-PT: Via de administração: Inalação; Injeção intramuscular; Injeção intravenosa; Spray nasal; Oral; Injeção subcutânea; Sublingual; Supositório; Tópico; Adesivo transdérmico; Outro
zh-CN: 给药途径: 吸入; 肌肉注射; 静脉注射; 鼻喷雾; 口服; 皮下注射; 舌下含服; 栓剂; 专题; 透皮贴片; 其他
ko: 투여 경로: 흡입; 근육주사; 정맥주사; 비강 스프레이; 구강; 피하주사; 설하; 좌약; 토픽; 경피 패치; 기타
es: Vía de administración: Inhalación; Inyección intramuscular; Inyección intravenosa; Spray nasal; Oral; Inyección subcutánea; Sublingual; Supositorio; Topical; Parche transdérmico; Otros
lt-LT: Vartojimo būdas: Įkvėpimas; Injekcija į raumenį; Injekcija į veną; Nosies purškalas; Geriamas; Poodinė injekcija; Po liežuviu; Žvakutė; Vietinis; Transdermalinis pleistras; Kita
zh-TW: 給藥途徑: 吸入; 肌肉注射; 靜脈注射; 鼻噴劑; 口腔; 皮下注射; 舌下; 栓劑; 局部; 透皮貼片; 其他
en: Route of administration: Inhalation; Intramuscular injection; Intravenous injection; Nasal spray; Oral; Subcutaneous injection; Sublingual; Suppository; Topical; Transdermal patch; Other
nb: Administrasjonsrute: Inhalasjon; Intramuskulær injeksjon; Intravenøs injeksjon; Nesespray; Oral; Subkutan injeksjon; Sublingual; Stikkpille; Lokal; Transdermalt plaster; Annet
pl: Droga podania: Wziewnie; Wstrzyknięcie domięśniowe; Wstrzyknięcie dożylne; Aerozol do nosa; Ustnie; Wstrzyknięcie podskórne; Podjęzykowy; Czopki; Miejscowo; Plaster transdermalny; Inne
hu: Beadási mód: Belélegzés; Intramuszkuláris injekció; Intravénás injekció; Orrspray; Orális; Szubkután injekció; Nyelv alatti; Kúp; Helyi; Transzdermális tapasz; Egyéb
fr: Voie d’administration: Inhalation; Injection intramusculaire; Injection intraveineuse; Spray nasal; Oral; Injection sous-cutanée; Sublingual; Suppositoire; Topique; Patch transdermique; Autre
da: Administrationsvej: Inhalation; Intramuskulær injektion; Intravenøs injektion; Næsespray; Oral; Subkutan injektion; Sublingual; Suppositorium; Topisk; Transdermal plaster; Andet
it: Via di somministrazione: Inalazione; Iniezione intramuscolare; Iniezione endovenosa; Spray nasale; Orale; Iniezione sottocutanea; Sublinguale; Supposta; Tipico; Cerotto transdermico; Altro
nl: Toedieningsroute: Inhalatie; Intramusculaire injectie; Intraveneuze injectie; Neusspray; Mondeling; Subcutane injectie; Sublinguaal; Zetpil; Lokaal; Transdermale pleister; Andere
vi: Đường dùng: Hít; Tiêm bắp; Tiêm tĩnh mạch; Xịt mũi; Thuốc uống; Tiêm dưới da; Dưới lưỡi; Thuốc đặt; Thuốc bôi; Miếng dán thấm qua da; Khác
ro-RO: Cale de administrare: Inhalare; Injecție intramusculară; Injecție intravenoasă; Spray nazal; Orală; Injecție subcutanată; Sublingual; Supozitor; Topic; Plasture transdermic; Altele
sk-SK: Spôsob podávania: Inhalácia; Intramuskulárna injekcia; Intravenózna injekcia; Nosový sprej; Ústny; Subkutánna injekcia; Sublingválne; Čapík; Lokálny; Transdermálna náplasť; Iné
de: Verabreichungsweg: Inhalation; Intramuskuläre Injektion; Intravenöse Injektion; Nasenspray; Oral; Subkutane Injektion; Sublingual; Zäpfchen; Aktuell; Transdermales Pflaster; Sonstiges
ru: Путь применения: Ингаляция; Внутримышечная инъекция; Внутривенная инъекция; Назальный спрей; Оральный; Подкожная инъекция; Подъязычный; Суппозитории; Местный; Трансдермальный пластырь; Другой
sv: Administreringsväg: Inhalation; Intramuskulär injektion; Intravenös injektion; Nässpray; Oral; Subkutan injektion; Sublingual; Stolpiller; Aktuell; Transdermalt plåster; Övrigt
cs: Způsob podání: Inhalace; Intramuskulární injekce; Intravenózní injekce; Nosní sprej; Ústní; Subkutánní injekce; Sublingvální; Čípek; Topická léčba; Transdermální náplast; Jiné
tr: Uygulama yolu: İnhalasyon; Kas içi enjeksiyon; Damar içi enjeksiyon; Burun spreyi; Oral; Deri altı enjeksiyon; Dil altı; Fitil; Topikal; Transdermal yama; Diğer
hr-HR: Način primjene: Inhalacija; Intramuskularna injekcija; Intravenska injekcija; Sprej za nos; Oralno; Potkožna injekcija; Sublingvalno; Supozitorij; Lokalno; Transdermalni flaster; Ostalo
el: Οδός χορήγησης: Εισπνοή; Ενδομυϊκή ένεση; Ενδοφλέβια ένεση; Ρινικό σπρέι; Στοματική χρήση; Υποδόρια ένεση; Υπογλώσσιο; Υπόθετο; Τοπικός; Διαδερμικό επίθεμα; Άλλο
th: วิถีการให้ยา: การสูดดม; การฉีดเข้ากล้ามเนื้อ; การฉีดเข้าเส้นเลือดดำ; สเปรย์พ่นจมูก; ช่องปาก; การฉีดใต้ผิวหนัง; ใต้ลิ้น; ยาเหน็บ; เฉพาะที่; แผ่นแปะผิวหนัง; อื่นๆ
ja: 投与経路: 吸入; 筋肉内注射; 静脈内注射; 鼻スプレー; 口腔; 皮下注射; 舌下; 座薬; トピカル; 経皮パッチ; その他
bg-BG: Път на приложение: Инхалация; Мускулна инжекция; Венозна инжекция; Назален спрей; Орално; Подкожна инжекция; Сублингвален; Супозитория; Топично; Трансдермален пластир; Други